Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.31.030

Report—Manner of filing.

No ordinance or resolution shall be passed allowing such claim or any part thereof, or appropriating any money or other property to pay or satisfy the same or any part thereof, until the claim has first been referred to the proper department or committee, nor until such department or committee has made its report thereon to the legislative body of the code city pursuant to such reference.

No action shall be maintained against any code city for any claim for damages until the claim has been filed in the manner set forth in chapter 4.96 RCW.

[ 1993 c 449 s 9; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.31.030.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1993 c 449: See notes following RCW 4.96.010.